Utah statutes.
48-2c-121.   Scope of notice.
(1)  Articles of organization that have been filed with the division
constitute notice to third persons, and to members and managers of the
company:
(a)  that the company is a limited liability company formed under the laws of
this state; and
(b)  of all statements set forth in the articles of organization that are:
(i)  required by Subsection 48-2c-403(1) to be set forth in articles of
organization; and
(ii)  expressly permitted to be set forth in the articles of organization by
Subsection 48-2c-403(4).
(2)  The filing with the division of any annual report required by Section
48-2c-203 constitutes notice to third persons, as well as to members and
managers of the company, of the information set forth in the annual report
which is required by Section 48-2c-203 to be set forth in an annual report.
(3)  The filing with the division of any statement allowed by Section
48-2c-122 is notice to third persons, as well as to members and managers of
the company, of the information set forth in that statement which is expressly
permitted to be set forth in that statement by Section 48-2c-122.
(4)  The filing with the division of a certified copy of a court order under
Subsection 48-2c-809(5) is notice of the contents of the order to:
(a)  third persons;
(b)  members of the company; and
(c)  managers of the company.
